Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 1 PROGRAMS AND SERVICES
27-80-112. Legislative declaration - treatment program for high-risk pregnant women - creation.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the health and well-being of the women of Colorado is at risk; that such women are at risk of poor birth outcomes or physical and other disabilities due to substance abuse, which is the abuse of alcohol and drugs, during the prenatal period; that early identification of such high-risk pregnant women and substance abuse treatment greatly reduce the occurrence of poor birth outcomes; and that the citizens of Colorado will greatly benefit from a program to reduce poor birth outcomes and subsequent problems resulting from such poor birth outcomes in cases involving high-risk pregnant women through the cost savings envisioned by the prevention and early treatment of such problems.

In recognition of such problems, there is hereby created a treatment program for high-risk pregnant women in the behavioral health administration.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 728, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1557, § 153, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-212 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-80-113. Substance use and addiction counseling and treatment - necessary components.

Any entity that qualifies to provide services pursuant to section 25.5-5-202 (1)(r) in regard to the treatment program for high-risk pregnant women, shall make available, in addition to substance use and addiction counseling and treatment: Risk assessment services; care coordination; nutrition assessment; psychosocial counseling; intensive health education, including parenting education and education on risk factors and appropriate health behaviors; home visits; transportation services; and other services deemed necessary by the BHA and the department of health care policy and financing.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 728, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1358, § 263, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1558, § 154, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-213 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-80-114. Treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women - cooperation with organizations.

The department of health care policy and financing shall cooperate with any organizations that desire to assist the department of health care policy and financing in the provision of services connected with the treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women. Organizations may provide services that are not provided to persons pursuant to the treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women, article 2 of title 26, and articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, which may include, but shall not be limited to, needs assessment services, preventive services, rehabilitative services, care coordination, nutrition assessment, psychosocial counseling, intensive health education, home visits, transportation, development of provider training, child care, and other necessary components of residential or outpatient treatment or care.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 728, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1193), ch. 272, p. 2570, § 6, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-214 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1193, see section 1 of chapter 272, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

27-80-115. Treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women - data collection.

The department of health care policy and financing shall create a data collection mechanism regarding persons receiving services pursuant to the treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women that must include the collection of data on cost-effectiveness, success of the program, and other data the department of health care policy and financing deems appropriate.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 728, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1193), ch. 272, p. 2570, § 7, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-215 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1193, see section 1 of chapter 272, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

27-80-116. Fetal alcohol spectrum disorders - legislative declaration - health warning signs.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Fetal alcohol exposure is the leading known cause of preventable intellectual and developmental disabilities and birth defects in the children of this state;

Individuals with undiagnosed fetal alcohol spectrum disorders suffer substantially from secondary issues such as child abuse and neglect, separation from families, multiple foster placements, depression, aggression, school failure, juvenile detention, and job instability;

Compared to individuals diagnosed before age twelve, individuals with undiagnosed FASD are two to four times more likely to suffer from inappropriate sexual behavior; disrupted school experiences; trouble with the law; alcohol and substance problems or disorders; or confinement in a jail, a hospital or treatment facility for persons with behavioral or mental health disorders, or a substance use disorder treatment facility;

These secondary disabilities come at a high cost to individuals, their families, and society;

A survey performed in 2006 by the Colorado pregnancy risk assessment system estimated that eleven and two-tenths percent of women in Colorado said that they drank alcohol during the last three months of their pregnancy; and

The commission should evaluate the current use and distribution of written and electronic informational materials designed to increase awareness of the consequences of drinking alcohol while pregnant and should investigate additional means by which such written and electronic materials might best be used.

The general assembly therefore declares that fetal alcohol exposure and its related problems can be reduced substantially by a greater awareness of the consequences of drinking alcohol while pregnant and by early diagnosis and receipt of appropriate and effective intervention.

Each person licensed pursuant to section 44-3-401 (1)(h) to (1)(t) or 44-3-401 (1)(v) to sell malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors or licensed pursuant to section 44-4-104 (1)(c) to sell fermented malt beverages is hereby encouraged to post a health warning sign informing patrons that the consumption of alcohol during pregnancy may cause birth defects, including fetal alcohol spectrum disorders.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 728, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1144), ch. 65, p. 170, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2015:

(3) and (4)(c) amended, (HB 15-1204), ch. 121, p. 374, § 23, effective April 24.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 783, § 80, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

IP(1) and (1)(b.5) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1359, § 264, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1080, § 16, effective October 1.

27-80-117. Rural alcohol and substance abuse prevention and treatment program - creation - administration - cash fund - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Program" means the rural alcohol and substance abuse prevention and treatment program created pursuant to subsection (2) of this section that shall consist of the rural youth alcohol and substance abuse prevention and treatment project and the rural detoxification project.

"Rural area" means a county with a population of less than thirty thousand people, according to the most recently available population statistics of the United States bureau of the census.

"Youth" means an individual who is at least eight years of age but who is less than eighteen years of age.

There is created the rural alcohol and substance abuse prevention and treatment program in the BHA to provide:
(2) (a) (I) There is created the rural alcohol and substance abuse prevention and treatment program in the BHA to provide:

Prevention and treatment services to youth in rural areas. The services may include providing alternative activities for youth through the rural youth alcohol and substance abuse prevention and treatment project; and

Treatment services through the rural detoxification project for persons with substance use disorders.

The BHA shall administer the program pursuant to rules adopted by the state board of human services as of January 1, 2010, or as amended by the state board.

The BHA shall incorporate provisions to implement the program into its regular contracting mechanism for the purchase of prevention and treatment services pursuant to section 27-80-106, including detoxification programs. The BHA shall develop a method to equitably distribute and provide additional money through contracts to provide for prevention services for and treatment of persons in rural areas.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the BHA shall implement the program on or after January 1, 2011, subject to the availability of sufficient money to operate an effective program, as determined by the BHA.

There is created in the state treasury the rural alcohol and substance abuse cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", that consists of the rural youth alcohol and substance abuse prevention and treatment account, referred to in this section as the "youth account", and the rural detoxification account, referred to in this section as the "detoxification account". The fund is comprised of money collected from surcharges assessed pursuant to sections 18-19-103.5, 42-4-1307 (10)(d)(I), and 42-4-1701 (4)(f). The money collected from the surcharges must be divided equally between the youth account and the detoxification account. The fund also includes any money credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section. Money in the fund credited pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section must be divided equally between the youth account and the detoxification account unless the grantee or donor specifies to which account the grant, gift, or donation is to be credited. The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the BHA for the purpose of implementing the program. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund remains in the fund. Any unexpended or unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains in the fund and shall not be transferred or credited to the general fund or another fund; except that any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund as of August 30, 2025, is credited to the general fund.

The BHA is authorized to accept grants, gifts, or donations from any private or public source on behalf of the state for the purpose of the program. The BHA shall transmit all private and public money received through grants, gifts, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the fund.

(3.5) As of July 1, 2022, the department of public health and environment is the state department responsible for the administration of prevention services pursuant to this section.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2025.

Prior to such repeal, the program shall be reviewed as provided in section 24-34-104, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 730, § 2, effective April 29; (3)(a) amended, (HB 10-1347), ch. 258, p. 1159, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(3)(a) and (4)(a) amended, (HB 16-1168), ch. 93, p. 261, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 2017:

(2) and (3) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1359, § 265, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

IP(2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II), (2)(b), (2)(c), and (3), amended and (3.5) added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1558, § 155, effective July 1.

27-80-118. Center for research into substance use disorder prevention, treatment, and recovery support strategies - established - appropriation - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

Opioid addiction has emerged as a significant public health concern in Colorado, with more than ten thousand deaths attributed to drug overdoses since 2000, and the annual rate of death from drug overdose doubling from seven-point-eight deaths per one hundred thousand people in 2000 to fifteen-point-seven deaths per one hundred thousand people in 2015. This rate is significantly higher than the national rate.

The abuse of prescription drugs is the fastest growing substance abuse problem in the United States, particularly among adolescents;

Each year, there are approximately seventeen thousand overdose deaths from opioid painkillers nationally and approximately three hundred such deaths in Colorado;

According to the centers for disease control, Colorado's drug overdose mortality rate has increased by five hundred percent since 2014;

Colorado and other states in the region have the highest death rates attributable to alcohol in the country, and approximately eighteen percent, or one out of every five, of all Colorado adults engaged in heavy or binge drinking monthly;

In addition to opioids, prescription drugs, and alcohol, surveys show use rates for methamphetamine, cocaine, and other illicit drugs are higher in Colorado than in other states; and

There is a lack of sufficient research on the most effective strategies for addressing substance use disorders across the full continuum of recommended services that include prevention, early intervention, treatment, and recovery support services.

The general assembly therefore finds that for Colorado to respond to these issues and to foster the health, welfare, and safety of the state's residents, it is hereby declared that it is the state's policy to facilitate research into substance use disorder prevention, treatment, and recovery support strategies.

A center for research into substance use disorder prevention, treatment, and recovery support strategies, referred to in this section as the "center", is established in the university of Colorado health sciences center. Subject to available appropriations, the center's mission is to:

Establish or expand programs for research concerning prevention, treatment, and recovery support strategies for substance use disorders, including but not limited to opioid addiction;

Establish or expand innovative treatments for substance use disorders, including but not limited to opioid addiction;

Expand partnerships and collaboration with substance use disorder professionals, other programs at the university of Colorado, and other organizations with similar missions throughout the state and nation; and

Seek federal and private resources to further the center's research activities.

The center shall develop and implement a series of continuing education activities designed to help a prescriber of pain medication to safely and effectively manage patients with pain and, when appropriate, prescribe opioids or medication-assisted treatment. The educational activities must also include best practices for prescribing benzodiazepines and the potential harm of inappropriately limiting prescriptions to chronic pain patients. The educational activities must apply to physicians, physician assistants, nurses, and dentists, with an emphasis on physicians, physician assistants, nurses, and dentists serving underserved populations and communities.

The center shall also develop education and training for law enforcement officers and first responders concerning the use of opioid antagonists for opioid overdose and community-based training for persons at risk of opioid overdose.

The center shall engage in community engagement activities to address substance use prevention, harm reduction, criminal justice system response, treatment, and recovery.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall appropriate seven hundred fifty thousand dollars to the center from the marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501 for the purposes of this subsection (4).

The center shall develop and implement a program to increase public awareness concerning the safe use, storage, and disposal of opioids and the availability of naloxone and other drugs used to block the effects of an opioid overdose.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, and each state fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall appropriate two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the center from the marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501 (1) for the purposes of this subsection (5).

The center may employ up to three additional employees to work as grant writers in order to aid local communities in need of assistance in applying for grants to access state and federal money to address opioid and other substance use disorders in their communities. The center shall determine the communities in which to provide the grant writing assistance.

For the fiscal year 2019-20, the general assembly shall appropriate money from the marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501 (1) to the department for allocation to the center for the purposes of this subsection (6). The center may use the money to hire new employees and for the direct and indirect costs associated with this subsection (6).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-193), ch. 202, p. 747, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2018:

(4) added, (HB 18-1003), ch. 224, p. 1429, § 5, effective May 21.

L. 2019:

(5) and (6) added, (SB 19-228), ch. 276, p. 2605, § 10, effective May 23.

L. 2020:

(5)(b)(I) amended, (HB 20-1364), ch. 205, p. 1009, § 1, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(4)(c) RC&RE, (4)(d) added, and (5)(b) amended, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2375, § 20, effective June 28; (4)(a) amended, (HB 21-1276), ch. 364, p. 2402, § 17, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(c)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (4)(c), effective September 1, 2019. (See L. 2018, p. 1429.)

Cross references:

(1) For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1276, see section 1 of chapter 364, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-80-119. Care navigation program - creation - reporting - rules - legislative declaration - definition.

The general assembly finds that:

Many individuals who need treatment for substance use disorders must wait weeks or months to access residential or outpatient services;

When dealing with a substance use disorder, any delay in starting treatment could mean life or death for the affected individual; and

Individuals who are engaged in seeking treatment for a substance use disorder would benefit from care navigation services to connect those individuals with available treatment facilities or programs.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that care navigation services that help individuals who are ready to begin treatment to gain timely access to that treatment are vital to the well-being of many Coloradans in crisis.

As used in this section, "engaged client" means an individual who is interested in and willing to engage in substance use disorder treatment and recovery services or other treatment services either for the individual or an affected family member or friend.

Subject to available appropriations, the BHA shall implement a care navigation program to assist engaged clients in obtaining access to treatment for substance use disorders. At a minimum, services available statewide must include independent screening of the treatment needs of the engaged client using nationally recognized screening criteria to determine the correct level of care; the identification of licensed or accredited substance use disorder treatment options, including social and medical detoxification services, medication-assisted treatment, and inpatient and outpatient treatment programs; and the availability of various treatment options for the engaged client.

To implement the care navigation program, the BHA shall include care navigation services in the twenty-four-hour telephone crisis service created pursuant to section 27-60-103. The contractor selected by the BHA must provide care navigation services to engaged clients statewide. Care navigation services must be available twenty-four hours a day and must be accessible through various formats. The contractor shall coordinate services in conjunction with other state care navigation and coordination services and behavioral health response systems to ensure coordinated and integrated service delivery. The use of peer support specialists is encouraged in the coordination of services. The contractor shall assist the engaged client with accessing treatment facilities, treatment programs, or treatment providers and shall provide services to engaged clients regardless of the client's payer source or whether the client is uninsured. Once the engaged client has initiated treatment, the contractor is no longer responsible for care navigation for that engaged client for that episode. Engaged clients who are enrolled in the medical assistance program pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5 shall be provided with contact information for their managed care entity. The contractor shall conduct ongoing outreach to inform behavioral health providers, counties, county departments of human or social services, jails, law enforcement personnel, health-care professionals, and other interested persons about care navigation services.

The contractor shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the office of the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care created pursuant to section 27-80-303. If the contractor believes that a health benefit plan is in violation of state and federal parity laws, rules, or regulations pursuant to section 10-16-104 (5.5) and the "Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008", Pub.L. 110-343, as amended, with the engaged client's written permission, the contractor shall assist the engaged client with reporting the alleged violation to the office of the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care.

The contractor shall collect and transmit to the BHA, in the time and manner determined by rule of the state board of human services, the following data and information relating to engaged clients served by the contractor:

Demographic characteristics of the engaged client, including age, sex, ethnicity, and county of residence;

The type of substance for which the engaged client is seeking treatment;

Any self-reported or identified mental health conditions;

Whether the engaged client was able to secure treatment and where, and, if not, the reasons why;

The length of time the contractor provided care navigation services to the engaged client;

Whether the engaged client had private or public insurance or was eligible for services through the BHA due to income;

Services or treatment options that were not available in the engaged client's community, including recovery services, housing, transportation, and other supports; and

The number of family members or friends calling on behalf of an engaged client or an individual with a substance use disorder.

The state board of human services may promulgate any rules necessary to implement the care navigation program.

No later than September 1 during the first year in which the care navigation program is implemented pursuant to this section, and no later than September 1 of each year thereafter in which the care navigation program is implemented, the BHA shall submit an annual report to the joint budget committee, the public and behavioral health and human services committee and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives, and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees, concerning the utilization of care navigation services pursuant to this section, including a summary of the data and information collected by the contractor pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, in accordance with state and federal health-care privacy laws. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirements of this subsection (8) continue indefinitely.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1287), ch. 175, p. 2015, § 3, effective May 14.

L. 2020:

(3) and (8) amended, (HB 20-1391), ch. 211, p. 1026, § 2, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1021), ch. 256, p. 1512, § 9, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(3), (4), IP(6), (6)(f), (7), and (8) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1559, § 156, effective July 1.

27-80-120. Building substance use disorder treatment capacity in underserved communities - grant program.

There is created in the behavioral health administration the building substance use disorder treatment capacity in underserved communities grant program, referred to in this section as the "grant program".

Subject to available appropriations, the BHA shall award grant program money to increase substance use disorder capacity and services in rural and frontier communities. Each managed service organization area that consists of at least fifty percent rural or frontier counties shall receive an equal proportion of the annual grant program money to disburse in local grants.

A grant committee shall review grant applications and, if approved, award local grants. The grant committee includes two members appointed by the county commissioners in the relevant managed service organization service area, two representatives from the managed service organization, and two members representing the BHA and appointed by the commissioner. The award of a local grant must be approved by a majority of the members of the grant committee. In awarding a local grant, the grant committee shall prioritize geographic areas that are unserved or underserved. After local grants are approved for each managed service organization service area, the BHA shall disburse grant program money to the managed service organization for distribution to local grant recipients.

Local grants must be used to ensure that local communities increase access to a continuum of substance use disorder treatment and recovery services, including medical or clinical detoxification, residential treatment, recovery support services, and intensive outpatient treatment.

Local governments, municipalities, counties, schools, law enforcement agencies, and primary care or substance use disorder treatment providers within or outside of the managed service organization's network of providers may apply for a local grant to provide services.

Money appropriated for the pilot program that remains unexpended and unencumbered at the end of the fiscal year is further appropriated to the BHA for the pilot program in the next fiscal year.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1287), ch. 175, p. 2018, § 4, effective May 14.

L. 2021:

(7) repealed, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2375, § 21, effective June 28; (4) amended, (HB 21-1021), ch. 256, p. 1512, § 10, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1), (2), (3), and (6) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1560, § 157, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-80-121. Perinatal substance use data linkage project - center for research into substance use disorder prevention, treatment, and recovery support strategies - report.

The center for research into substance use disorder prevention, treatment, and recovery support strategies established in section 27-80-118, referred to in this section as the "center", in partnership with an institution of higher education and the state substance abuse trend and response task force established in section 18-18.5-103, may conduct a statewide perinatal substance use data linkage project that uses ongoing collection, analysis, interpretation, and dissemination of data for the planning, implementation, and evaluation of public health actions to improve outcomes for families impacted by substance use during pregnancy. The data linkage project shall utilize data from the medical assistance program, articles 4 to 6 of title 25.5; the electronic prescription drug monitoring program created in part 4 of article 280 of title 12; the Colorado TRAILS system, as defined in section 16-20.5-102 (10); the Colorado immunization information system, created pursuant to section 25-4-2401, et seq.; the Colorado child care assistance program, created in part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5; the BHA; and birth and death records to examine the following:

Health-care mortality utilization by pregnant and postpartum women with substance use disorders and their infants compared to the general population;

Human service, public health program utilization, and substance use treatment by pregnant and postpartum women with substance use disorders and their infants;

Health-care, human service, and public health program outcomes among pregnant and postpartum women with substance use disorders and their infants; and

Costs associated with health-care, human service, and public health program provisions for pregnant and postpartum women with substance use disorders and their infants.

The data linkage project shall use vital records to establish maternal and infant dyads beginning at the birth hospitalization and retrospectively link the prenatal period and prospectively link the first year postpartum.

The data linkage project may conduct ongoing research related to the incidence of perinatal substance exposure or related infant and family health and human service outcomes based on the standards specified in sections 19-1-103 (1)(a)(VII) and 19-3-102 (1)(g) for determining child abuse or neglect or whether a child is neglected or dependent.

The data linkage project may connect additional state and non-state data sources for the purpose of improving population-level estimates of perinatal substance exposure and examining system utilization and outcomes.

The governor's office of information technology shall obtain data and perform secure linkage and anonymization on behalf of the state.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before January 1, 2021, and annually thereafter throughout the duration of the data linkage project, the center shall report progress on the data linkage project and the results, if available, to the health and insurance committee and the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives and the health and human services committee of the senate or their successor committees.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-228), ch. 276, p. 2606, § 12, effective May 23.

L. 2020:

(2.5) added, (SB 20-028), ch. 186, p. 854, § 7, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2375, § 22, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 864, § 119, effective July 1; IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1561, § 158, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this subsection IP(1) by HB 22-1278 and HB 22-1295 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-80-122. Recovery residence certifying body - competitive selection process - appropriation.

No later than January 1, 2022, the BHA shall use a competitive selection process pursuant to the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, to select a recovery residence certifying body to:

Certify recovery residences pursuant to section 25-1.5-108.5; and

Educate and train recovery residence owners and recovery residence staff on industry best practices, including best practices for providing culturally responsive and trauma-informed care.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall appropriate two hundred thousand dollars to the BHA for the purpose of implementing this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1009), ch. 274, p. 2591, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2021:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2376, § 23, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

IP(1) and (2) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1561, § 159, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-80-123. High-risk families cash fund - creation - services provided - report - definition.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "high-risk children and youth" means children or youth at risk of entering or who are involved with the juvenile justice system or the child welfare system.

There is created in the state treasury the high-risk families cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund consists of money credited to the fund and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the BHA, which may expend money from the fund for the purposes specified in subsection (4) of this section.

Repealed.

The BHA may expend money in the fund for the following purposes:

For services to high-risk parents, including pregnant and parenting women, with substance use disorders;

For services for high-risk children and youth with behavioral health disorders; and

For services for families with behavioral health needs, including family-centered treatment models.

The BHA may use money from the fund to contract with managed service organizations, private providers, schools, counties, nonprofit organizations, or municipalities to provide services described in subsection (4) of this section.

Money expended by the BHA must be used for one-time allocations to increase treatment capacity, including start-up costs and capital expenditures, or to provide substance use disorder recovery and wraparound services, including the prenatal plus program and access to child care, to high-risk families.

After considering relevant stakeholder feedback, the BHA shall annually prioritize the use of available money in the fund, recognizing statewide need and complementing existing funding for behavioral health services statewide.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, the BHA shall submit a report to the general assembly on July 1, 2020, and on July 1 each year thereafter, which report must include:

A summary of expenditures from the fund made by the BHA;

The impact of the expenditures in increasing services for high-risk families; and

Any recommendations to strengthen and improve access to services and services provided with money from the fund.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1193), ch. 272, p. 2571, § 8, effective May 23.

L. 2020:

(3) repealed, (HB 20-1388), ch. 124, p. 523, § 4, effective June 24.

L. 2021:

(4) and (5)(b) amended, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2386, § 34, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(2), IP(4), (5), (6), IP(7), and (7)(a) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1561, § 160, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was numbered as § 27-80-119 in HB 19-1193 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1193, see section 1 of chapter 272, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

(2) For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-80-124. Colorado substance use disorders prevention collaborative - created - mission - administration - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1276), ch. 364, p. 2402, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1562, § 161, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 25-20.5-1802 in 2022.

27-80-125. Housing assistance for individuals with a substance use disorder - rules - report - appropriation.

The BHA shall establish a program to provide temporary financial housing assistance to individuals with a substance use disorder who have no supportive housing options when the individual is:

Transitioning out of a residential treatment setting and into recovery; or

Receiving treatment for the individual's substance use disorder.

The BHA may promulgate rules establishing the maximum amount of temporary financial assistance that an individual can receive and the maximum amount of time for which an individual may receive assistance. Rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection (2) related to the time for which an individual may receive assistance must be clinically based, culturally responsive, and trauma-informed.

In awarding temporary financial housing assistance in accordance with this section, the BHA shall consider funding for individuals entering into a recovery residence, as defined in section 25-1.5-108.5 (1)(a).

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), by February 1, 2022, and by February 1 each year thereafter, the BHA shall submit a report detailing the amount of housing assistance provided in the prior year, the number of individuals and the entities that received the housing assistance, and the duration of housing assistance each individual or entity received to the health and human services committee of the senate, the health and insurance and the public and behavioral health and human services committees of the house of representatives, and the opioid and other substance use disorders study committee created in section 10-22.3-101, or any successor committees.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall appropriate four million dollars to the BHA for the purpose of the housing program described in this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2377, § 24, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

IP(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1562, § 162, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.